Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.009

Determination of public employee eligibility for benefits.

(1) The authority, or an employing agency at the authority's direction, shall initially determine and periodically review whether a public employee is eligible for benefits pursuant to the criteria established under this chapter.

(2) An employing agency shall inform a public employee in writing whether or not he or she is eligible for benefits when initially determined and upon any subsequent change, including notice of the public employee's right to an appeal.

[ 2023 c 51 s 2; 2018 c 260 s 3; 2015 c 116 s 1; 2009 c 537 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 537: See note following RCW 41.05.008.